Utah statutes.
34A-1-105.   Commission budget -- Reports from divisions.

(1)  The commission shall prepare and submit to the governor for inclusion in the governor's budget to be submitted to the Legislature, a budget of the commission's financial requirements needed to carry out its responsibilities as provided by law during the fiscal year following the Legislature's next annual general session.

(2)  The commissioner shall require a report from each of the divisions and offices of the commission, to aid in preparation of the commission budget.

